pl: Poziom utrzymania strzały: Pełne zamknięcie; Brak zamknięcia; Częściowe zamknięcie; Inne
ro-RO: Nivel de izolare a săgeții: Reținere completă; Fără reținere; Reținere parțială; Altele
zh-CN: 箭矢包覆程度: 全包覆; 无包覆; 半包覆; 其他
de: Pfeilhaltestufe: Vollständige Fixierung; Keine Fixierung; Teilweise Fixierung; Sonstige
ja: 矢封じ込めレベル: フルコンテインメント; ノーコンテインメント; パーシャルコンテインメント; その他
ru: Уровень удержания стрелы: Полное удержание; Без удержания; Частичное удержание; Другое
sv: Pilomslutningsnivå: Fullständig inneslutning; Ingen inneslutning; Delvis inneslutning; Annat
fi: Nuolihyllyn malli: Täysin suljettu; Ei suljettu; Osittain suljettu; Muu
cs: Úroveň vedení šípu: Plné uzavření; Bez uzavření; Částečné uzavření; Ostatní
pt-PT: Nível de contenção da flecha: Contenção total; Sem contenção; Contenção parcial; Outros
tr: Ok kapsama seviyesi: Tam kavrama; Kavrama yok; Kısmi kavrama; Diğer
da: Pilens indeslutningsniveau: Fuld fastholdelse; Ingen fastholdelse; Delvis fastholdelse; Andet
zh-TW: 弓箭控制等級: 全包覆; 無包覆; 半包覆; 其他
hu: Nyíl zártsági szintje: Teljesen zárt; Nyitott; Félig zárt; Egyéb
el: Επίπεδο συγκράτησης βέλους: Πλήρης συγκράτηση; Χωρίς συγκράτηση; Μερική συγκράτηση; Άλλο
th: ระดับการยึดเก็บลูกธนู: ประคองลูกธนูแบบเต็มรูปแบบ; ไม่ประคองลูกธนู; ประคองลูกธนูบางส่วน; อื่นๆ
ko: 화살 고정 수준: 완전 억제; 억제 없음; 부분 억제; 기타
lt-LT: Strėlių fiksavimo lygis: Visiškas prilaikymas; Be prilaikymo; Dalinis prilaikymas; Kita
sl-SI: Stopnja zajetja puščice: Popolno zadrževanje; Brez zadrževanja; Delno zadrževanje; Drugo
sk-SK: Úroveň zachytávania šípu: Úplné obopnutie; Bez obopnutia; Čiastočné obopnutie; Iné
hr-HR: Razina obuhvaćanja strijele: Potpuno zadržavanje; Bez zadržavanja; Djelomično zadržavanje; Ostalo
en: Arrow containment level: Full containment; No containment; Partial containment; Other
pt-BR: Nível de contenção da flecha: Contenção total; Sem contenção; Contenção parcial; Outro
it: Livello di contenimento della freccia: Contenimento totale; Nessun contenimento; Contenimento parziale; Altro
nb: Pilinneslutningsnivå: Full innkapsling; Ingen innkapsling; Delvis innkapsling; Annet
nl: Pijl insluitingsniveau: Volledige omsluiting; Geen omsluiting; Gedeeltelijke omsluiting; Overige
es: Nivel de contención de la flecha: Contención total; Sin contención; Contención parcial; Otro
fr: Niveau de retenue de la flèche: Maintien complet; Sans maintien; Maintien partiel; Autre
vi: Mức độ chứa mũi tên: Giữ mũi tên hoàn toàn; Không giữ mũi tên; Giữ mũi tên một phần; Khác
bg-BG: Ниво на задържане на стрелата: Пълно задържане; Без задържане; Частично задържане; Друго